Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.370

Prearrangement service contracts—Abandoned trusts.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5316-S.SL) ***

Any trust which has not matured or been refunded and for which no beneficiary can be located fifty years after its creation shall be considered abandoned and will be handled in accordance with the escheat laws of the state of Washington.

[1989 c 390 s 13.]